Utah statutes.
26-8a-410.   Local approvals.

(1)  Licensed ambulance providers and paramedic providers shall meet all local zoning and business licensing standards generally applicable to businesses operating within the jurisdiction.

(2)  Publicly subsidized providers shall demonstrate approval of the taxing authority that will provide the subsidy.

(3)  A publicly operated service shall demonstrate that the governing body has approved the provision of services to the entire exclusive geographic service area that is the subject of the license, including those areas that may lie outside the territorial or jurisdictional boundaries of the governing body.

